Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.100

Review of order.

Any officer subjected to disciplinary action may, within ten days after the service of the order upon the officer, apply to the superior court of Thurston county for a writ of review to have the reasonableness and lawfulness of the order inquired into and determined.

The superior court shall review the determination of the chief of the Washington state patrol in a summary manner, based upon the record of the hearing before the trial board, and shall render its decision within ninety days, either affirming or reversing the order of the chief, or remanding the matter to the chief for further action. A transcript of the trial board hearing shall be provided to the court by the state patrol after being paid for by the officer subjected to disciplinary action. However, if the officer prevails before the court, the state patrol shall reimburse the officer for the cost of the transcript.

[ 1984 c 141 s 4; 1965 c 8 s 43.43.100. Prior: 1943 c 205 s 6; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 6362-71.]